Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
25.5-1-129. State department proposal - state option for health-care coverage - report to general assembly - waiver authorization - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that:

Every Coloradan deserves access to high-quality, affordable health care to help support his or her well-being and economic security;

To achieve these goals, Colorado has successfully implemented provisions of the federal "Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act" that have helped expand access and increase affordability to thousands of Coloradans, including expanding medicaid coverage to more low-income adults and creating the Colorado health benefit exchange;

Despite this success, in several regions of the state, health insurance is not affordable due to high health-care costs and limited or no competition among insurance carriers as well as other marketplace factors, and Coloradans cannot afford the health insurance premiums and out-of-pocket expenses;

Specifically, Coloradans in fourteen counties have access to only a single health insurance carrier participating in the Colorado health benefit exchange, and the number of uninsured Coloradans in those counties is rising;

Colorado has historically been a national leader in health-care innovation;

Uncertainty at the federal level requires Colorado to be proactive and explore and implement its own innovative solutions to provide greater access to affordable, high-quality health-care coverage for Colorado residents; and

A state option for health-care coverage that uses existing state health-care infrastructure may decrease costs for Coloradans, increase competition, and improve access to high-quality, affordable, and efficient health care.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that tasking the state department and the division of insurance in the department of regulatory agencies, referred to in this section as "the division", with developing a proposal that considers the feasibility and cost of implementing a state option for health-care coverage that leverages existing state health-care infrastructure, increases competition, improves quality, and provides stable access to affordable health insurance will enable policymakers to consider and create an innovative state option for health insurance coverage to benefit Colorado.

On or before November 15, 2019, the state department and the division shall develop and submit a proposal to the joint budget committee; the public health care and human services and health and insurance committees of the house of representatives; and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees, for a state option for health-care coverage that leverages existing state infrastructure.

In addition to submitting the proposal to the committees of the general assembly listed in subsection (2)(a) of this section, the state department and the division shall present a summary of the proposal at the annual joint meeting of the house and senate committees conducted during the legislative interim prior to the 2020 legislative session pursuant to section 2-7-203.

The proposal must describe a state option for health-care coverage. The proposal must identify the most effective implementation of a state option based on affordability to consumers at different income levels, administrative and financial burden to the state, ease of implementation, and likelihood of success in meeting the objectives described in subsection (1) of this section.

In developing the proposal, the state department and the division shall:

Conduct actuarial research to identify the potential cost of premiums and cost sharing to pay claims in a plan that is, at a minimum, an essential health-benefit-compliant plan, as defined in section 10-16-102 (22);

Evaluate provider rates necessary to incentivize participation and encourage network adequacy and high-quality health-care delivery;

Evaluate eligibility criteria for individuals and small businesses to participate;

Determine the impact, if any, on the state budget;

Determine the impact on the stability of the individual market, the small group market, and the Colorado health benefit exchange created in article 22 of title 10;

Evaluate the impact on consumers eligible for financial assistance for plans purchased on the exchange;

Determine whether a state option plan should be offered on or off the exchange;

Determine whether the state option plan should be a fully at-risk, managed care, fee-for-service, or accountable care collaborative plan, or a combination thereof;

Determine whether the state option should be offered through the state department, and identify the expected impact, if any, to the Colorado medical assistance program established in articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title 25.5;

Identify the expected impact, if any, to the children's basic health plan established in article 8 of this title 25.5;

Investigate funding options, including but not limited to state funds and federal funds secured through available waivers;

Evaluate the feasibility, legality, and scope of any necessary federal waivers;

Repealed.

Create a statewide definition of affordability for consumers.

In developing the proposal, the state department and the division shall consult with the Colorado health benefit exchange and shall engage in a stakeholder process that includes public and private health insurance experts, as well as consumers, consumer advocates, employers, providers, and carriers.

The proposal submitted to the committees of the general assembly pursuant to this section must include detailed analysis of the proposed state option and the various methods for implementing the proposed state option, as well as any identified statutory or rule changes necessary to implement the proposed state option.

After the proposal created pursuant to this section is submitted and presented to the committees of the general assembly, the state department and the division shall prepare and submit any federal waivers or state plan amendments necessary to fund and implement the state option for health-care coverage as described in the proposal created pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(7) (a) (I) After the proposal created pursuant to this section is submitted and presented to the committees of the general assembly, the state department and the division shall prepare and submit any federal waivers or state plan amendments necessary to fund and implement the state option for health-care coverage as described in the proposal created pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section.

The state department's and the division's requests for federal authorization must seek to obtain the maximum amount of federal money available to the state and to persons participating in the state option for health-care coverage.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7)(a)(I) of this section to the contrary, the preparation and submission of federal waivers or amendments must be delayed if a member of the general assembly files a bill during the 2020 legislative session by the regular bill filing deadline of the house of representatives, as set forth in rule 23 of the joint rules of the senate and house of representatives, that substantially alters the federal authorization required pursuant to the proposal to implement the state option for health-care coverage, and such bill is not postponed indefinitely in the first committee of reference. The department's and the division's waiver preparation process shall resume after the bill is postponed indefinitely or, if passed by the general assembly, the requested waivers or state plan amendments must reflect the requirements in the passed legislation.

Subject to the conditions described in subsection (7)(b) of this section, the state department and the division may promulgate rules, as necessary, for the preparation and submission of federal waivers or state plan amendments necessary to fund and implement the proposal.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1004), ch. 206, p. 2199, § 1, effective May 17.

L. 2021:

(4)(m) repealed, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2801, § 19, effective July 2.

25.5-1-130. Improving access to behavioral health services for individuals at risk of entering the criminal or juvenile justice system - duties of the state department.

On or before March 1, 2020, the state department shall develop measurable outcomes to monitor efforts to prevent medicaid recipients from becoming involved in the criminal or juvenile justice system.

On or before July 1, 2021, the state department shall work collaboratively with managed care entities to create incentives for behavioral health providers to accept medicaid recipients with severe behavioral health disorders. The incentives may include, but need not be limited to, higher reimbursement rates, quality payments to managed care entities for adequate networks, establishing performance measures and performance improvement plans related to network expansion, transportation solutions to incentivize medicaid recipients to attend health-care appointments, and incentivizing providers to conduct outreach to medicaid recipients to ensure that they are engaged in needed behavioral health services, including technical assistance with billing procedures. The state department may seek any federal authorization necessary to create the incentives described in this subsection (2).

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-222), ch. 226, p. 2265, § 2, effective May 20.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 300, § 56, effective September 14.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-222, see section 1 of chapter 226, Session Laws of Colorado 2019. For the legislative declaration in SB 20-136, see section 1 of chapter 70, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

25.5-1-131. Insurance ombudsman - consumer advocate - duties.

There is hereby created in the state department the office of the insurance ombudsman to act as the advocate for consumer interests in matters related to access to and the affordability of the standardized health benefit plan created pursuant to section 10-16-1304. The ombudsman shall:

Interact with consumers regarding their access to, the affordability of, and coverage issues with the standardized plan;

Evaluate data to assess the standardized plan's network and affordability; and

Represent the interests of consumers in public hearings held pursuant to section 10-16-1306.

In the performance of the ombudsman's duties, the ombudsman shall act independently of the state department. Any recommendations made or positions taken by the ombudsman do not reflect those of the state department.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1232), ch. 241, p. 1294, § 7, effective June 16.

25.5-1-132. Report of medicaid reimbursement rates paid to community mental health center providers and independent providers - definition.

On or before August 15, 2022, the state department shall publish a behavioral health rates report of medicaid reimbursement rates for providers of community mental health centers, as defined in section 27-66-101 (2), and independent mental health and substance abuse treatment providers, as described in subsection (2) of this section. The state department shall contract with an independent auditor to prepare the behavioral health rates report, as described in this subsection (1). The state department shall prepare, in coordination with the behavioral health rates report, a set of recommendations on creating equitable payment and payment models that minimize inappropriate payment variation in comparable behavioral health services between the providers of community mental health centers and independent mental health and substance use treatment providers. The state department shall present the behavioral health rates report and recommendations to the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee, or any successor committee.

The report prepared pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must reflect data from state fiscal year 2020-21 and identify discrepancies, if any, and the reasons for such discrepancies in medicaid reimbursement rates paid to providers of a community mental health center and independent mental health and substance abuse treatment providers for comparable services. The report must include a determination of and recommendations on whether reimbursement rates paid to community mental health center providers and independent mental health and substance use treatment providers are adequate to meet or exceed network adequacy standards in every region of the state. The data must be aggregated to ensure individual community mental health centers and independent providers are not identifiable and must comply with any other state and federal privacy laws. On or before November 15, 2022, the state department shall present an action plan for implementation to the joint budget committee. The state department shall produce a progress report on the state department's progress made in implementing the action plan presented to the joint budget committee on November 15, 2022, on or before August 1, 2023, and annually thereafter through August 1, 2025, and provide an update during its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing pursuant to section 2-7-203 on the findings and additional recommendations. The state department must fully implement the action plan no later than December 31, 2025.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "independent mental health and substance abuse treatment providers" means any outpatient behavioral health provider enrolled in medicaid and contracted with a managed care entity, as defined in section 25.5-5-403 (4), that is not licensed or designated as a community mental health center.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1268), ch. 363, p. 2597, § 2, effective June 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1268, see section 1 of chapter 363, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.